District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-261

Local law.

Repealed.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-243, § 13, 42 DCR 91
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 12, 44 DCR 1271
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 30, 47 DCR 1325
1981 Ed., § 5-131.
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 29 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).
Purpose of Law 10-243: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 6-251.